Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 5. Pupil Records.

§ 22.1-287.
Limitations on access to records.

No teacher, principal or employee of any public school nor any school board member shall permit access to any records concerning any particular pupil enrolled in the school in any class to any person except under judicial process unless the person is one of the following:

Either parent of such pupil or such pupil; provided that a school board may require that such pupil, if he be less than 18 years of age, as a condition precedent to access to such records, furnish written consent of his or her parent for such access;

A person designated in writing by such pupil if the pupil is 18 years of age or older or by either parent of such pupil if the pupil is less than 18 years of age;

The principal, or someone designated by him, of a school where the pupil attends, has attended, or intends to enroll;

The current teachers of such pupil;

State or local law-enforcement or correctional personnel, including a law-enforcement officer, probation officer, parole officer or administrator, or a member of a parole board, seeking information in the course of his duties;

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, a member of his staff, the division superintendent of schools where the pupil attends, has attended, or intends to enroll or a member of his staff;

An officer or employee of a county or city agency responsible for protective services to children, as to a pupil referred to that agency as a minor requiring investigation or supervision by that agency.

A parent or pupil entitled to see the records pursuant to subdivision A 1 shall have access to all records relating to such pupil maintained by the school except as otherwise provided by law and need only appear in person during regular hours of the school day and request to see such records. No material concerning such pupil shall be edited or withheld except as otherwise provided by law, and the parent or pupil shall be entitled to read such material personally.

The giving of information by school personnel concerning participation in athletics and other school activities, the winning of scholastic or other honors and awards, and other like information shall be governed by the provisions of § 22.1-287.1.

Notwithstanding the restrictions imposed by this section:

A division superintendent of schools may, in his discretion, provide information to the staff of an institution of higher education or educational research and development organization or laboratory if such information is necessary to a research project or study conducted, sponsored, or approved by the institution of higher education or educational research and development organization or laboratory and if no pupil will be identified by name in the information provided for research;

The name and address of a pupil, the record of a pupil’s daily attendance, a pupil’s scholastic record in the form of grades received in school subjects, the names of a pupil’s parents, a pupil’s date and place of birth, and the names and addresses of other schools a pupil has attended may be released to an officer or employee of the United States government seeking this information in the course of his duties when the pupil is a veteran of military service with the United States, an orphan or dependent of such veteran, or an alien;

The record of a pupil’s daily attendance shall be open for inspection and reproduction to an employee of a local department of social services who needs the record to determine the eligibility of the pupil’s family for public assistance and social services;

The principal or his designee may disclose identifying information from a pupil’s scholastic record for the purpose of furthering the ability of the juvenile justice system to effectively serve the pupil prior to adjudication. In addition to those agencies or personnel identified in subdivisions A 5 and 7, the principal or his designee may disclose identifying information from a pupil’s scholastic record to attorneys for the Commonwealth, court services units, juvenile detention centers or group homes, mental and medical health agencies, state and local children and family service agencies, and the Department of Juvenile Justice and to the staff of such agencies. Prior to disclosure of any such scholastic records, the persons to whom the records are to be disclosed shall certify in writing to the principal or his designee that the information will not be disclosed to any other party, except as provided under state law, without the prior written consent of the parent of the pupil or by such pupil if the pupil is 18 years of age or older.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.26; 1975, c. 639; 1976, c. 682; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 535; 1996, c. 1000; 1997, c. 910; 2002, c. 747; 2007, cc. 48, 555; 2018, c. 806.

Cross references.

For requirement that if public school boards or public institutions of higher education provide access to buildings, grounds and the student information directory to persons or groups which make students aware of occupational or educational options, they must provide access on the same basis to official recruiting representatives of the military forces, see §

2.2-3804

. As to information sharing between and among Serious or Habitual Offender Comprehensive Action Program committees, see § 16.1-330.1.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subdivision D 1, substituted “institution of higher education” for “college, university” twice; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, in subdivision D 3, deleted “welfare or” following “local department of,” and added “and social services” following “public assistance.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 48 and 555 are identical and added subdivision D 4.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 806, in subsection C, deleted “restrictions imposed by this section shall not apply to the” preceding “giving of information” and inserted “shall be governed by the provisions of § 22.1-287.1.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Subpoena of educational records. —

When plaintiff alleged lead poisoning, the court permitted defendants to subpoena the school records of his mother under Va. Sup. Ct. R. 4:9 so that an expert could use them in determining whether plaintiff’s deficits were due to lead or other factors, such as the mother’s education and intelligence. The records were not privileged under subsection A of § 22.1-287, and they were relevant and reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence under Va. Sup. Ct. R. 4:1; however, non-medical records in the school records were to be kept under seal because of their sensitive nature and medical records in the school records excluded from production because they did not contain information about the mother’s intelligence or educational level. Bunch v. Artz, 71 Va. Cir. 358, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 252 (Portsmouth Aug. 15, 2006).

No privilege created. —

Subsection A of § 22.1-287 does not create an evidentiary privilege, but its provisions are relevant in determining the appropriate scope and manner of discovery. Bunch v. Artz, 71 Va. Cir. 358, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 252 (Portsmouth Aug. 15, 2006).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority to deny access to a law-enforcement officer. —

The provisions of § 22.1-287 may be reconciled with those of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA). The school superintendent possesses authority to rely upon FERPA provisions to deny access to a pupil’s records to a law-enforcement officer seeking information in the course of his duties. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Kenneth L. Alger, II, Commonwealth’s Attorney for Page County, 12-096, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 29 (5/3/13).

Rules of School Board restricting speech at public meetings. —

Certain rules of School Board restricting the speech of speakers at public meetings violate the free speech rights of speakers; the Board may not constitutionally bar speakers from discussing personnel issues or identifying individual school employees or officials during public session. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard L (Rick) Morris, Member, House of Delegates, 15-020, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 5 (4/15/16).

§ 22.1-287.01.
Student information; release to federal government agencies.

Except as required by federal law or regulation, no member or employee of a local school board or the Department of Education shall transmit personally identifiable information, as that term is defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and related regulations, from a student’s record to a federal government agency or an authorized representative of such agency.

History.

2014, c. 322.

§ 22.1-287.02.
Students’ personally identifiable information.

The Department of Education shall develop and make publicly available on its website policies to ensure state and local compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and state law applicable to students’ personally identifiable information, including policies for (i) access to students’ personally identifiable information and (ii) the approval of requests for student data from public and private entities and individuals for the purpose of research.

In cases in which electronic records containing personally identifiable information are reasonably believed by the Department of Education or a local school division to have been disclosed in violation of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) or other federal or state law applicable to such information, the Department or local school division shall notify, as soon as practicable, the parent of any student affected by such disclosure, except as otherwise provided in §

32.1-127.1:05

or

18.2-186.6

. Such notification shall include the (i) date, estimated date, or date range of the disclosure; (ii) type of information that was or is reasonably believed to have been disclosed; and (iii) remedial measures taken or planned in response to the disclosure.

History.

2015, c. 139.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 139, cl. 2 made this section effective August 1, 2015.

§ 22.1-287.03.
Unique student identification numbers.

Neither the Department of Education nor any local school board shall require any student enrolled in a public elementary or secondary school or receiving home instruction pursuant to § 22.1-254.1, or his parent, to provide the student’s federal social security number.

The Department of Education shall develop a system of unique student identification numbers. Each local school board shall assign such a number to each student enrolled in a public elementary or secondary school. No student identification number shall include or be derived from the student’s federal social security number. Each student shall retain his student identification number for as long as he is enrolled in a public elementary or secondary school in the Commonwealth.

History.

2015, cc. 372, 666.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2015 acts having been § 22.1-287.02.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 372 and 666, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on August 1, 2015.”

§ 22.1-287.04.
Uniformed services-connected students.

For purposes of this section, a “uniformed services-connected student” means a student enrolled in a public school whose parent is serving in either (i) the active component of the U.S. Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or National Guard, the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, or the Commissioned Corps of the U.S. Public Health Services or (ii) the reserve component of the U.S. Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or National Guard.

The Department of Education shall establish a process for the identification of newly enrolled uniformed services-connected students by local school divisions. Local school divisions shall identify newly enrolled uniformed services-connected students in accordance with such process.

Nonidentifiable, aggregate data collected from the identification of uniformed services-connected students shall be made available to local, state, and federal entities for the purposes of becoming eligible for nongeneral fund sources and receiving services to meet the needs of uniformed services-connected students residing in the Commonwealth.

Data collected from the identification of uniformed services-connected students shall not be a public record as defined in §

2.2-3701

. No person shall disclose such data except as permitted under the provisions of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and related regulations. No such data shall be used for the purposes of student achievement, the Standards of Accreditation, student-growth indicators, the school performance report card, or any other school rating system.

History.

2015, cc. 582, 583.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2015 acts having been § 22.1-287.02.

§ 22.1-287.1.
Directory information.

Notwithstanding §§ 22.1-287 and 22.1-288, directory information, as defined by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) (FERPA), and which may include a student’s name, sex, address, telephone listing, date and place of birth, major field of study, participation in officially recognized activities and sports, weight and height as a member of an athletic team, dates of attendance, degrees and awards received, and other similar information, may be disclosed in accordance with federal and state law and regulations, provided that the school has given notice to the parent or eligible student of (i) the types of information that the school has designated as directory information, (ii) the right of the parent or eligible student to refuse the designation of any or all of the types of information about the student as directory information, and (iii) the period of time within which the parent or eligible student must notify the school in writing that he does not want any or all of the types of information about the student designated as directory information. However, no school shall disclose the address, telephone number, or email address of a student pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) unless the parent or eligible student has affirmatively consented in writing to such disclosure. Additionally, except as required by state or federal law, no school shall disclose the address, telephone number, or email address of a student pursuant to 34 C.F.R. § 99.31(a)(11) unless (a) the disclosure is to students enrolled in the school or to school board employees for educational purposes or school business and the parent or eligible student has not opted out of such disclosure in accordance with this subsection and school board policy or (b) the parent or eligible student has affirmatively consented in writing to such disclosure. This subsection shall not apply to any disclosure, other than a disclosure pursuant to 34 C.F.R. § 99.31(a)(11), permitted under FERPA.

For purposes of this section, an “eligible student” is a student 18 years of age or older or a student under the age of 18 who is emancipated.

History.

1983, c. 432; 2018, c. 806; 2019, c. 229.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 806 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 229, in subsection A, inserted “(FERPA)” deleted “34 C.F.R. § 99.31(a)(11) or” preceding “the Virginia Freedom of Information Act” and added the last two sentences.

§ 22.1-288.
Furnishing information to public or private school or institution of higher education or private business or professional school or institution of higher education or military force.

Notwithstanding § 22.1-287, the principal of any public school may permit the furnishing of or may furnish the names and addresses of pupils presently enrolled or pupils who have terminated their enrollment to any officer or employee of a public or private school or institution of higher education or any official of a private business or professional school or institution of higher education or any official recruiting representative of the military forces of the Commonwealth and the United States. This information shall be furnished for the purpose of informing pupils and former pupils of the educational and career opportunities available in the institutions or the military. No such public or private school or institution of higher education or private business or professional school or institution of higher education or official recruiting representative or the military force he represents shall use such information for purposes not directly related to the academic or professional goals of the institution or the military force. If any school or institution or any official representative or military force violates the provisions of this section, the privilege of the school, institution, or military force to receive the lists shall be suspended for a period of two years from the time of discovery of the misuse of such lists.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.27; 1975, c. 639; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 258.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: substituted “or institution of higher education” for “college, or university” in text and section heading; substituted “institution of higher education” for “college” in text and section heading; and substituted “institution” for “college or university” twice in the last sentence and made a related change.

§ 22.1-288.1.
Notation in school records of missing children; local law-enforcement cooperation.

Each school board shall receive reports of disappearances of any children living within the school division from local law enforcement pursuant to §

52-31.1

.

Upon notification by a local law-enforcement agency of a child’s disappearance, the principal of any school in which the child was enrolled at the time of the disappearance shall indicate, by mark, in the child’s cumulative record that the child has been reported as missing. Upon notification by law enforcement that the child is located, the principal shall remove the mark from the record.

Upon receiving a request from any school or person for copies of the cumulative records and birth certificate of any child who has been reported by a local law-enforcement agency to be missing, the school being requested to transfer the records shall immediately notify the law-enforcement agency that provided the report to the school of the child’s disappearance of the location of the school or person requesting the cumulative records and birth certificate of the child, without alerting the requestor of such report.

For the purposes of this section, a “mark” shall mean an electronic or other indicator that (i) is readily apparent on the student’s record and (ii) will immediately alert any school personnel that the record is that of a missing child.

History.

1990, c. 295; 2006, c. 295.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 295 inserted the subsection designations; in subsection A, deleted “develop a cooperative arrangement with the local law-enforcement agencies within its jurisdiction to” preceding “receive reports,” and added “from local law enforcement pursuant to §

52-31.1

” at the end; in subsection B, inserted “by mark” and added the last sentence; added “without alerting the requestor of such report” at the end of subsection C; and added subsection D.

§ 22.1-288.2.
Receipt, dissemination and maintenance of records of certain law-enforcement information.

A division superintendent shall disseminate the notice or information regarding an adjudication of delinquency or conviction for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260, contained in a notice received by him pursuant to § 16.1-305.1 to school personnel responsible for the management of student records and to other relevant school personnel, including, but not limited to, the principal of the school in which the student is enrolled. The principal shall further disseminate such information to licensed instructional personnel and other school personnel who (i) provide direct educational or support services to the student and (ii) have a legitimate educational interest in such information.

A parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of a student in a public school and, with consent of a parent or in compliance with a court order, the court in which the disposition was rendered, shall be notified in writing of any disciplinary action taken with regard to any incident upon which the adjudication of delinquency or conviction for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260 was based and the reasons therefor. The parent or guardian shall also be notified of his or her right to review, and to request an amendment of, the student’s scholastic record, in accordance with regulations of the Board of Education governing the management of scholastic records.Every notice of adjudication of delinquency or conviction for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260 received by a superintendent, and information contained in the notice, which is not a disciplinary record as defined in Board of Education regulations, shall be maintained by him and by any others to whom he disseminates it, separately from all other records concerning the student. However, if the school administrators or the school board takes disciplinary action against a student based upon an incident which formed the basis for the adjudication of delinquency or conviction for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260, the notice shall become a part of the student’s disciplinary record.

When a superintendent receives notice of the filing of a petition from the intake officer in accordance with § 16.1-260, or upon request of a court services unit for information made in conjunction with the preparation of a social history report pursuant to § 16.1-273, the superintendent shall provide information regarding the student’s educational and attendance status to the intake officer or court services unit, as the case may be. Whenever a division superintendent receives notice of a student’s commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice, the superintendent or his designee shall participate in the development of a reenrollment plan as provided in § 16.1-293.

History.

1994, cc. 835, 913; 1995, c. 429; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1998, c. 870; 2003, c. 119.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 755 and 914, cls. 7, provide: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall apply to offenses committed and to records created and proceedings held with respect to those offenses on or after July 1, 1996.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 inserted “regarding an adjudication of delinquency or conviction for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260” in the first sentence of subsection A; and in subsection B, three times inserted “of delinquency” following “adjudication” and “for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260” following “conviction.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 22.1-289.
Transfer and management of scholastic records; disclosure of information in court notices; penalty.

As used in this section:“Scholastic record” means those records that are directly related to a student and are maintained by an educational agency or institution or by a party acting for the agency or institution. These include, but are not limited to, documentation pertinent to the educational growth and development of students as they progress through school, student disciplinary records, achievement and test data, cumulative health records, reports of assessments for eligibility for special education services, and Individualized Education Programs. Such records may be recorded in any way, including, but not limited to, handwriting, print, computer media, video or audio tape, film, microfilm, and microfiche.A notice of adjudication or conviction received by a superintendent relating to an incident which did not occur on school property or during a school-sponsored activity shall not be a part of a student’s scholastic record.The term “scholastic record” also shall not include records of instructional, supervisory, administrative, and ancillary educational personnel that are kept in the sole possession of the maker of the record and are not accessible or revealed to any other person except a temporary substitute for the maker of the record.

Whenever a pupil transfers from one school division to another, the scholastic record or a copy of the scholastic record shall be transferred to the school division to which the pupil transfers upon request from such school division. Permission of the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the student shall not be required for transfer of such scholastic record to another school or school division within or outside the Commonwealth.

Any notice of disposition received pursuant to § 16.1-305.1 shall not be retained after the student has been awarded a diploma or a certificate as provided in § 22.1-253.13:4.

Every student’s scholastic record shall be available to the student and his parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the student for inspection during the regular school day. Permission of the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the student, or of a student who is 18 years of age or older, shall not be required for transfer of such scholastic record to another school or school division within or without this Commonwealth.Consistent with federal law and regulation, each school shall annually notify parents of students currently enrolled and in attendance of their rights under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and related regulations.A school responding to a request for the transfer of the scholastic record from another school division need not provide written notice of the transfer of the record, including the identity of the requester, to the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the student, or to a student who is 18 years of age or older, if the school has previously included in the annual notice required by this subsection a statement that it forwards such records to such requesting school divisions.

Whenever the division superintendent is notified by the Department of Juvenile Justice, pursuant to § 16.1-287, or by a school division employee responsible for education programs in a local jail or a detention center, that a pupil who last attended a school within the school division is a pupil in a school of a juvenile correctional center of the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a pupil in an educational program in a local jail or detention center, the school division superintendent or his designee shall transfer the scholastic record of such pupil to the designated juvenile correctional center or local jail or a detention center, as the case may be, within five work days. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall transfer the scholastic record of a student who has been discharged from a juvenile correctional center to the relevant school division within five work days of the student’s discharge.The Board of Education shall adopt regulations concerning the transfer and management of scholastic records from one school division to another, to the learning centers of the Department of Juvenile Justice, and to educational programs in local jails and detention centers.Upon receiving notice of a foster care placement of a student across jurisdictional lines, the sending school division and the receiving school division, as such school divisions are defined in subsection D of § 22.1-3.4, shall expedite the transfer of the scholastic record of the student.

The division superintendent or his designee shall notify the local police or sheriff’s department for investigation as a possible missing child of any enrolled pupil whose scholastic record he is unable to obtain within 60 days or sooner, if the division superintendent or his designee has reason to suspect that the pupil is a missing child.

Superintendents and their designees shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability in connection with any notice to a police or sheriff’s department of a pupil lacking a scholastic record or failure to give such notice as required by this section.

Except as provided in §§ 16.1-309 and 22.1-287 and this section, a superintendent or his designee, or other school personnel who unlawfully discloses information obtained pursuant to § 16.1-305.1 shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.28; 1975, c. 639; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 593; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1993, cc. 740, 889; 1994, cc. 808, 835, 913; 1996, c. 1000; 2000, c. 86; 2005, c. 343; 2006, c. 47; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Cross references.

As to confidentiality of educational records under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.4

. As to supervision of juvenile during commitment and on parole, see § 16.1-293. As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which amended this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make the amendatory provisions of the 1990 act effective July 1, 1991.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 86, in subsection D, divided the subsection into three paragraphs, deleted “However” at the end of the first paragraph, inserted the second paragraph, and, substituted “need not” for “shall” and “if the school has previously included in the annual notice required by this subsection a statement that it forwards such records to such requesting school divisions” for “within five days of the date in which the record was transferred” in the third paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 343 added the last paragraph in subsection E and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 47, in subsection A, added the third sentence in the first paragraph, and substituted “also shall” for “does” in the third paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and in subsection E, in the first sentence, deleted “the Department of Correctional Education, pursuant to § 22.1-344 of this title” following “§ 16.1-287,” and in the last sentence, substituted “The Department of Juvenile Justice” for “The Department of Correctional Education” and deleted “of the Department of Juvenile Justice” following “juvenile correctional center.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).